District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “1000 U Street NW Property Tax Clarification and Limited Grantmaking
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 10 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Code is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents to the chapter is amended by striking the section designation "§
47-1045. Prince Hall Freemason and Eastern Star Charitable Foundation, lot 0826 in square
0333." and inserting “§ 47-1045. Prince Hall Free and Accepted Mason and Order of the Eastern
Star Charitable Educational Foundation.” in its place.
(b) Section 47-1045 is amended as follows:
(1) The heading is amended to read as follows:
“§ 47-1045. Prince Hall Free and Accepted Mason and Order of the Eastern Star


Charitable Educational Foundation.”
(2) The existing text is labeled as subsection (a).
(3) Strike the phrase “described as lot 0826 in square 0333 situated at 1000 “U”
Street, N.W.” and insert the phrase “currently described for assessment and taxation purposes as
Square 333 Lots 37 and 828” in its place.
(4) Strike the phrase “in the name of the Prince Hall Freemason and Eastern Star
Charitable Foundation” and insert the phrase “in the name of the Prince Hall Free and Accepted
Mason and Order of the Eastern Star Charitable Educational Foundation, or any successor in
interest,” in its place.
(5) Strike the phrase “purposes and activities of the Prince Hall Freemason and
Eastern Star Charitable Foundation” and insert “purposes and activities of the Prince Hall Free
and Accepted Mason and Order of the Eastern Star Charitable Educational Foundation”.
(6) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b) Any real property tax payments, including payments of penalties and interest, made
for tax years 2023, and 2024 in association with the real property described in subsection (a) of
this section shall be refunded to the payor.”.
Sec. 3. African American Civil War Memorial sub-district and cultural arts center limited
grantmaking authority.
Section 2032 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development Limited
Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168; D.C.
Code § 1-328.04), is amended by adding a new subsection (ii) to read as follows:
“(ii) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor may make a


grant to the Prince Hall Free and Accepted Mason and Order of the Eastern Star Charitable
Educational Foundation (“Foundation”), or a commercial tenant of space leased by the
Foundation at 1000 U Street, N.W.., in order to support the implementation of recommendations
for that space and the adjacent plaza made in the Shaw/U Street Cultural Destination District
Plan, as approved by the Shaw/U Street Cultural Destination District Plan Approval Resolution
of 2005, effective June 21, 2005 (Res. 16-209; 52 DCR 4185).”
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.